Utah statutes.
11-32-3.   Creation of county interlocal finance authority as nonprofit
corporation -- Organization -- Acquisition of delinquent tax receivables --
Personnel -- Duties of elected attorney and treasurer.
(1)  The governing body of any county within the state may, by resolution,
organize a nonprofit corporation as the financing authority for the county on
behalf of public bodies within the county under this chapter, following the
procedures set out in Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation
Act, solely for the purpose of accomplishing the public purposes for which the
public bodies exist by financing the sale or assignment of the delinquent tax
receivables within the county to the financing authority.  The authority shall
be known as the "Interlocal Finance Authority of (name of county)."
(2)  If the governing body of any county creates an authority on behalf of any
other public body within the county, the resolution shall further state the
name or names of the other public bodies.  A certified copy of the resolution
creating the authority shall be delivered to the governing body of the other
public bodies.  The governing bodies of each of the other public bodies shall
either approve or reject the creation of the authority, but if no action has
been taken within 30 days of delivery of the certified copy of the resolution
to the governing body it shall be considered rejected.
(3)  Following the approval, rejection, or considered rejection of the
resolution by the governing bodies of each of the public bodies listed in the
initial resolution, the county shall then amend the resolution to delete the
public bodies rejecting the resolution and shall list the participant members
of the authority.
(4)  The governing bodies of the participant members shall approve the
articles of incorporation and bylaws of the authority.  Members of governing
bodies of each of the participant members, or a paid employee of the governing
body designated by the member, shall be selected to form and shall act as the
board of trustees of the authority.  The powers of the board of trustees may
be vested in an executive committee to be selected from among the board of
trustees by the members of the board of trustees. The articles of
incorporation and bylaws shall provide that the members of the board of
trustees of the authority may be removed and replaced by the governing body
from which such member was selected at any time in its discretion.  A majority
of the governing bodies of the participant members, based upon a percentage of
the property taxes levied for the year preceding the then current year, within
the county may, alter or change the structure, organization, programs, or
activities of the financing authority, subject to the rights of the holders of
the authority's bonds and parties to its other obligations.
(5)  Each financing authority may acquire by assignment the delinquent tax
receivables of the participant members creating the financing authority, in
accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations of this chapter,
in order to accomplish the public purposes for which the participant members
exist.
(6)  Except as limited by Subsection (7), a financing authority may contract
for or employ all staff and other personnel necessary for the purpose of
performing its functions and activities, including contracting with the
participant members within the county that created it to utilize any of the
personnel, property, or facilities of any of the participant members for that
purpose.  The authority may be reimbursed for such costs by the participant
member as provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws.
(7) (a)  With respect to any county that creates a financing authority and
which has an elected attorney or treasurer, or both, the elected attorney
shall be the legal advisor to and provide all legal services for the
authority, and the elected treasurer shall provide all accounting services for
the authority.  The authority shall reimburse the county for legal and
accounting services so furnished by the county, based upon the actual cost of
the services, including reasonable amounts allocated by the county for
overhead, employee fringe benefits, and general and administrative expenses.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (7) may not prevent the financing authority
from obtaining the accounting or auditing services from outside accountants or
auditors with the consent of the elected treasurer and the governing bodies or
from obtaining legal services from outside attorneys with the consent of the
elected attorney and the governing bodies.  The provisions of this subsection
may not prevent the authority from obtaining the opinions of outside attorneys
or accountants which are necessary for the issuance of the bonds of the
authority.
(c)  If 50% or more of the governing bodies of the participant members, based
upon property taxes charged for the preceding year as a percentage of all of
the property taxes charged within the county for that year, find it advisable
that the authority retain legal or accounting services other than as described
in Subsection (7)(a) they may direct the board of trustees to do so.
